Wyoming, session 2026, HB0165.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-3-418(a), (b)(iii) and (g) is
amended to read:

9-3-418. Amount of service retirement benefit;
firefighter members excluded.

(a) Before July 1, 2026, the normal retirement
benefit for a member who first becomes covered under this
HB0165

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0507
article after June 30, 1981 and before September 1, 2012 is
equal to two and one-eighth percent (2 1/8%) of the highest
average salary multiplied by his the member's years of
service credit for the first fifteen (15) years of service
credit, and two and one-fourth percent (2 1/4%) of the
highest average salary multiplied by his the member's years
of service credit for any years of service credit exceeding
fifteen (15) years. After July 1, 2026, the normal
retirement benefit for a member who first becomes covered
under this article after July 30, 1981 and before September
1, 2012 is equal to two and one-quarter precent (2 1/4%) of
the highest average salary multiplied by the member's years
of service credit for the first fifteen (15) years of
service credit, and two and three-eighths percent (2 3/8%)
of the highest average salary multiplied by the member's
years of service credit for any years of service credit
exceeding fifteen (15) years.

(b) The retirement benefit for a member with service
after March 31, 1953 but prior to July 1, 1981 is equal to
the following:

HB0165

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0507
(iii) Before July 1, 2026, two and one-eighth
percent (2 1/8%) of the member's highest average salary
multiplied by his the member's years of service credit for
the first fifteen (15) years of service credit, and two and
one-fourth percent (2 1/4%) of the member's highest average
salary multiplied by his the member's years of service
credit for any years of service credit exceeding fifteen
(15) years. After July 1, 2026, two and one-quarter percent
(2 1/4%) of the member's highest average salary multiplied
by the member's years of service credit for the first
fifteen (15) years of service credit, and two and
three-eighths percent (2 3/8%) of the member's highest
average salary multiplied by the member's years of service
credit for any years of service credit exceeding fifteen
(15) years.

(g) Before July 1, 2026, the normal retirement
benefit for a member initially employed after August 31,
2012 is equal to two percent (2%) of the highest average
salary multiplied by his the member's years of service
credit. After July 1, 2026, the normal retirement benefit
for a member initially employed after August 31, 2012 is
equal to two and one-eighths percent (2 1/8%) of the
HB0165

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0507
highest average salary multiplied by the member's years of
service credit.

Section 2. W.S. 9-3-453 and 9-3-454(a)(ii) and (iii)
are repealed.

Section 3. This act shall apply to all members whose
retirement benefits are calculated under W.S. 9-3-418(a),
(b) or (g), including those members retiring before July 1,
2026.

Section 4. The Wyoming retirement system shall take
any action necessary to implement this act.

HB0165

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0507
Section 5.

(a) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.

(b) Sections 4 and 5 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0165